Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 9 Establishment of Private Roads
Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Snell v. Ruppert, 582 P.2d 916,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

, 4 L.R.A. (n.s.) 169 (1905); Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 361 P.2d 678,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1961); Boller v. Key Bank, 829 P.2d 260,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1992); Yeager v. Forbes, 2003 WY 134, 78 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2003); Bush Land Dev. Co. v. Crook Cnty. Weed & Pest Control Dist., 2017 WY 12, 388 P.3d 536,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Acquiring Access to Private Landlocked Tracts: Wyoming's Statutory Right-of-Way, Walton v. Dana, 609 P.2d 461,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1980),” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 281 (1981).

For comment, “Gamesmanship on the Checkerboard: The Recurring Problem of Access to Interlocked Public and Private Lands Located Within the Pacific Railroad Land Grants,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 429 (1982).

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

For comment, “Death of the Dark Ages? The Troubled Law of Easements in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 151 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Extent and reasonableness of use of private way and exercise of easement granted in general terms, 3 ALR3d 1256.

Liability in connection with injury allegedly caused by defective condition of private road or driveway, 44 ALR3d 355.

Conveyance of “right of way,” in connection with conveyance of another tract, as passing fee or easement, 89 ALR3d 767.

Locating easement of way created by necessity, 36 ALR4th 769.

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated — state takings, 49 ALR5th 769.

Loss of private easement by nonuse, 62 ALR5th 219.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
100.04 (Matthew Bender).